Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.020

Alley.

"Alley" means a public highway not designed for general travel and used primarily as a means of access to the rear of residences and business establishments.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.020. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 3; prior: 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part.]